New York, session 2025-2026, S3049.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 837-y 2 to read as follows: 3 § 837-y. Use of robots prohibited. 1. Definitions. As used in this 4 section, the following terms have the following meanings: 5 (a) "Robot" means an artificial object or system that senses, proc- 6 esses and acts, to at least some degree, and is operated either autono- 7 mously by computers or by an individual remotely; 8 (b) "Weapon" means a device designed to inflict physical injury, 9 including nonlethal injury; 10 (c) "Surveillance" means any observation or monitoring of civilians. 11 2. No police agency shall authorize the use, attempted use or threat- 12 ened use of a robot armed with any weapon. 13 3. No police agency shall authorize the use, attempted use or threat- 14 ened use of a robot in any manner that can potentially cause injury, 15 regardless of whether or not the robot is armed with a weapon. 16 4. No police agency shall authorize the use, attempted use or threat- 17 ened use of a robot for surveillance purposes. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05926-01-5